Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-925
Retirement system; prior member; repayment authorized; limitation.

Any person who is now a school employee or becomes a school employee and who had elected out of the retirement system between July 1, 1945, and October 1, 1945, and subsequently elected into the retirement system may elect to repay the retirement system for any number of years of service for which he or she would have contributed had he or she not elected out of the retirement system. The amount to be repaid shall not exceed the amount of the contributions which would have been paid into the retirement system based on the compensation and years of service as a school employee as verified by school officials plus the interest which would have accrued on the amount under the retirement system. This section shall not apply to school employees who retire prior to January 1, 1987.

Laws 1987, LB 549, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 33;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1514.06;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 560.